Massachusetts, session 194th, S2862.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. There is hereby established and set up on the books of the commonwealth,
the Commonwealth Middle School Innovation Fund, the purpose of which shall be to provide
grants and other support to programs administered by local school districts and community
partners that engage project-centered group learning methods in grades 5-8 that integrate
multiple areas of subject matter including but not limited to science and mathematics, promote
learning among students at various skill levels, and seek to comport with the requirements of
time on learning as contained in statute and regulations promulgated by the department of
elementary and secondary education, including but not limited to 603 CMR 27.00.
Such grants may be used for purposes including but not limited to personnel costs,
curriculum development and design, and materials.
SECTION 2. Amounts shall be credited to the fund from legislative appropriation, gifts,
grants, and other sources, provided that the department of elementary and secondary education
shall work to identify and secure such grants to the maximum feasible extent. Amounts
of 3

contained in the fund shall not revert to the general fund, but shall remain available for
expenditure by the department, which shall promulgate regulations to distribute such grants in a
fair and equitable manner. In doing so the department shall consider factors including but not
limited to geographic distribution, distribution across the range of sizes of local school districts
and community partners across the commonwealth, and maximizing the impact of such grants in
developing programs and curriculum that are replicable and sustainable for such districts and
community partners.
SECTION 3. The fund shall be administered by the department, which shall develop and
maintain the Commonwealth Middle School Innovation Council for the purposes of advising the
department for the purposes of maximizing the effectiveness, sustainability, and practicality of
programs funded in whole or in part by such grants. Said council shall be chaired by the
commissioner of the department, and shall also include the secretary of education and the
secretary of energy and economic development, and 9 additional members to be appointed by the
governor, 1 of whom shall represent the Massachusetts Association of School Committees, 1 of
whom shall represent the Massachusetts Association of School Superintendents, 3 of whom shall
represent middle school educators from diverse geographic regions in the commonwealth, 1 of
whom shall represent local charitable education foundations, 2 of whom shall represent parents
of middle school students in the commonwealth, 1 of whom shall represent an an organized labor
organization representing educators in the commonwealth, and 1 of whom shall represent an
institution of higher learning in the commonwealth with expertise in education and science,
mathematics, and engineering. The council shall meet not less than twice per calendar year,
provided that its meetings shall be public and shall provide for remote observation by the public
through electronic means.
of 3

SECTION 4. The department shall produce an annual report detailing the amounts and
recipients of grants pursuant to this section, any innovative programs developed or supported by
such grants, opportunities for replication of such programs, and any legislative or regulatory
recommendations to improve or support the work of the fund. Said report shall be filed with the
clerks of the House and Senate, whom shall post them electronically for public inspection, not
later than December 31 of each calendar year.
of 3